Vermont, session 2025-2026, H416.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Kratom Consumer Protection Act.”
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. chapter 82, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. Kratom Consumer Protection Act
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 2 of 10
§ 4091. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Attractive to children” means the preparation, manufacturing, or
packaging of a kratom product in a manner that bears any reasonable
resemblance to an existing candy product or branded food product so as to be
easily mistaken for the candy product or the branded product, especially by
children.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Health.
(3) “Distributor” means a person that sells, distributes, or maintains
kratom products in the State or a person who advertises, represents, or holds
themselves out as selling, distributing, or maintaining kratom products in the
State.
(4) “Extract” means a substance or compound obtained by extraction of
the leaf of the plant Mitragyna speciosa, intended for ingestion, which contains
more than trace amounts of Mitragyna speciosa and other alkaloids of the plant
and does not contain any controlled substances or levels of residual solvents
higher than permitted by the U.S. Pharmacopeia 467.
(5) “Independent laboratory testing” means a laboratory that is
accredited by a third-party accrediting body as a competent testing laboratory
pursuant to ISO/IEC 17025 of the International Organization for
Standardization.
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 3 of 10
(6) “Kratom” means the plant Mitragyna speciosa or any part of the
plant.
(7) “Kratom food service establishment” means a food service
establishment licensed pursuant to chapter 85 of this title that sells or
distributes:
(A) kratom as a beverage prepared on-site; or
(B) a prepackaged kratom beverage or finished kratom product.
(8) “Kratom product” or “product” means a finished article containing
any part of the leaf of the plant Mitragyna speciosa in fresh, dehydrated, or
dried form, or a kratom extract.
(9) “Processor” means a person who prepares, manufactures, sells, or
maintains kratom products in the State or a person who advertises, represents,
or holds themselves out as preparing, manufacturing, selling, or maintaining
kratom products in the State.
(10) “Retailer” means a person who sells, distributes, advertises, or
represents kratom products or a person who holds themself out as selling,
distributing, advertising, or representing kratom products.
(11) “Synthesized material” means an alkaloid, metabolite, or alkaloid
derivative that has been created by chemical synthesis or biosynthetic means,
including fermentation, recombinant techniques, yeast-derived, and enzymatic
techniques, rather than traditional food preparation techniques, such as heating
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 4 of 10
or extracting, that synthetically alters the composition of any kratom alkaloid
or constituent.
§ 4092. KRATOM PRODUCT PROHIBITIONS
A processor or distributor shall not prepare, manufacture, sell, offer for sale,
distribute, or maintain in the State any kratom product that:
(1) contains or is adulterated with a dangerous non-kratom substance,
including a poisonous or otherwise deleterious non-kratom ingredient or
substance listed as a controlled substance under State or federal law;
(2) is mixed with another compound that is known to inhibit key
cytochrome P450 enzymes, including CYP3A4 or CYP2D6, or both, unless a
specific mixture is scientifically validated safe under the intended conditions of
use and are permitted by the Department by rule;
(3) is a kratom extract product that contains levels of residual solvents
exceeding those allowed in the U.S. Pharmacopeia;
(4) contains synthesized material;
(5) is in a form that is combustible, intended to be used for vaporization,
or injectable;
(6) is prepared, manufactured, or packaged in a manner that is attractive
to children; and
(7) is not registered on the Department’s registry pursuant to section
4093 of this subchapter.
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 5 of 10
§ 4093. KRATOM PRODUCT REGISTRATION
(a) A processor or distributor shall register annually with the Department
any kratom product that is in an approved kratom delivery form intended to be
offered for sale or distributed to a consumer in the State. The registering
processor or distributor shall pay a fee to the Department, subject to annual
adjustment, to cover all administrative costs for processing and administering
registrations and developing and maintaining a kratom product registry web
page on the Department’s website. The processor or distributor’s registration
application shall include:
(1) sworn assurances from the processor or distributor that any facility
in which the kratom product was prepared, manufactured, or maintained has a
valid food facility registration with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;
(2) evidence demonstrating that the processor or distributor has a
reasonable basis for believing the kratom product is safe for consumption
under the conditions of use set forth on the product’s label;
(3) a certificate of analysis from an independent testing laboratory
showing compliance with the requirements for kratom products in accordance
with this subchapter; and
(4) sworn assurances that the processor or distributor has a reasonable
basis for believing the kratom product complies with the prohibitions listed in
section 4092 of this title.
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 6 of 10
(b) A kratom product containing the same kratom ingredients in the same
approved kratom delivery form, but in a different container, package, or
volume, shall be included in a single registration.
(c) The Department shall publish and maintain a kratom registry page on its
website listing all kratom products currently registered for sale in the State to
enable retailers to verify whether a kratom product is permissible for sale or
distribution to consumers.
§ 4094. KRATOM PRODUCT LABELING
(a) Unless otherwise preempted under federal law, a kratom product
prepared, manufactured, sold, delivered, offered for sale, or maintained in the
State shall bear a conspicuous label on the packaging with the following:
(1) a recommendation against the use of the kratom product by
individuals under 21 years of age or who are pregnant or breastfeeding;
(2) a recommendation that an individual consult with a health care
professional prior to use;
(3) a statement that kratom may be habit forming;
(4) a statement in accordance with 21 C.F.R. § 101.93 that “These
statements have not been evaluated by the Food and Drug Administration.
This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent disease.”;
(5) the name and place of business of the processor or distributor
registering the kratom product; and
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 7 of 10
(6) instructions for use of the kratom product, including;
(A) the recommended amount of the kratom product per serving for
the specific approved product form, including capsules, gummies, beverages,
liquids, and loose powders;
(B) the recommended number of servings that can be safely
consumed in a 24-hour period;
(C) a listing of servings per container; and
(D) a listing of kratom alkaloids and other ingredients in the product,
including quantities not to exceed declarations of the amount per serving for
Mitragynine speciosa and 7-hydroxymitragynine.
(b) A kratom food service establishment serving kratom as a beverage
prepared on-site shall provide the information listed in subsection (a) of this
section to the customer by supplying a written document directly to the
customer or by prominently displaying the information near the point of sale
device.
(c) A kratom product containing a level of 7-hydrocymitragynine greater
than the two percent limit shall not be marketed or labeled on its packaging as
a kratom product or as a derivative of the alkaloid Mitragynine.
§ 4095. ENFORCEMENT
(a)(1) No person shall knowingly sell, distribute, offer for sale, hold for
sale, or give away a kratom product that is not registered with the Department.
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 8 of 10
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall:
(A) be fined not more than $5,000.00 for each unregistered product;
(B) be fined not more than $10,000.00 for a second or subsequent
violation relating to the same product; and
(C) be prohibited from selling a kratom product for a period of two
years for a third or subsequent violation relating to the same product.
(b)(1) No person shall knowingly sell kratom product intended for human
ingestion to an individual 21 years of age or younger.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall:
(A) be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than
$1,000.00, or both, for a first offense; or
(B) be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than
$2,000.00, or both, for a second or subsequent offense.
(c)(1) No person shall knowingly prepare, sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold
for sale, or give away a kratom product that contains a controlled substance
under the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 801–904, or a regulated
drug as defined in section 4201 of this title.
(2) A person who knowingly violates this subsection shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $3,000.00, or
both. These penalties shall be in addition to any other provision in law.
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 9 of 10
(d)(1) No person shall knowingly prepare, sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold
for sale, or give away a kratom product that contains synthetic mitragynine,
synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine, or any other synthetically derived compound
of the plant Mitragyna speciosa.
(2) A person who knowingly violates this subsection shall be
imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
These penalties shall be in addition to any other provision in law.
(e) Upon receipt of a report of an alleged violation regarding any kratom
product offered for sale, the Department shall require the registrant to produce
an updated and current certificate of analysis in a reasonable time frame from a
certified independent third-party laboratory showing compliance with the
requirements of this subchapter for safe kratom products and include copies of
all product labels. If the registrant does not provide the certificate of analysis
in the specified time frame, the registration for that product shall be revoked
and a stop sales order will be issued for products covered by this registration.
(f) If the Department has a reasonable basis to require an independent third-
party test of a registered kratom product by a laboratory of the Department’s
choice, the registrant shall be required to submit payment to the Department
for the test within a reasonable time frame. If the registrant does not tender
payment to the Department within 30 days following receipt of the invoice for
VT LEG #381089 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.416
2025 Page 10 of 10
the testing, the Department shall revoke the registration for that product and a
stop sales order will be issued for products covered by this registration.
(g) A retailer that relied in good faith upon the representations of a
processor or distributor of a kratom product shall not be in violation of this
section.
§ 4096. RULEMAKING
The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 for the
implementation of this subchapter, including:
(1) a process registering a kratom product by a processor or distributor;
(2) approved kratom product delivery forms;
(3) approved extraction methods used in the preparation or
manufacturing of kratom products; and
(4) contents of a certificate of analysis from an ISO 17025 laboratory
representing the product does not contain levels of residual solvents, biological
contaminants, or heavy metal contaminants that meet the standard for dietary
supplement products.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381089 v.1